Missouri, session 2026, SB881.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 436, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
four new sections, to be known as sections 436.575, 436.580,
436.585, and 436.590, to read as follows:
436.575. As used in sections 436.575 to 436.590, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Agent of a foreign principal", any person who
acts as an agent, representative, employee, or servant, or
any person who acts in any other capacity at the order,
request, or under the direction or control, of a foreign
principal or of a person any of whose activities are
directly or indirectly supervised, directed, controlled,
financed, or subsidized in whole or in major part by a
foreign principal, and who directly or through any other
person acts in the interest of such foreign principal;
(2) "Foreign principal", any government, person, or
entity described in the definition of "foreign principal" in
the Foreign Agents Registration Act of 1938, 22 U.S.C. 611;
(3) "Litigation expenses", costs incurred to pursue a
civil action, including, but not limited to, court costs,
filing fees, attorney's fees, expert witness fees, travel
expenses, and expenses related to identifying or soliciting

SB 881 2
potential clients to participate in the litigation before,
during, or after filing or resolving the civil action;
(4) "Litigation funder", a person or entity that
enters a litigation funding agreement or any person or
entity who has a direct or indirect right to receive
compensation from a litigation funding agreement. A
litigation funder does not include:
(a) A parent, sibling, spouse, grandparent,
grandchild, or child related by blood, adoption, or marriage
of the party being funded;
(b) An attorney who, at the time money is provided to
or on behalf of a client under a litigation funding
agreement, has an attorney-client relationship with the
party concerning the party's civil action;
(c) A licensed or registered financial institution
that does not receive, in consideration for loaning money to
any person, a right to receive payment from the value of any
proceeds or other consideration realized from any judgment,
award, settlement, verdict, or other form of monetary relief
any person may receive or recover in relation to any civil
action;
(d) A nonprofit entity that provides pro bono legal
services to the party with no right to receive payment from
the amount of any judgment, award, settlement, verdict, or
other form of monetary compensation obtained in the civil
action. Court ordered awards of costs or attorney's fees to
nonprofit legal organizations shall not be affected by this
section; or
(e) A person or entity that provides money to a party
for litigation solely for purposes other than funding
litigation expenses;

SB 881 3
(5) "Litigation funding agreement", with respect to
any civil action or group of civil actions, any written
agreement:
(a) Whereby a third party agrees to provide funds to
one of the named parties, or any law firm affiliated with
the action or group of civil actions; and
(b) Which creates a direct or collateralized interest
in the proceeds of a civil action or group of civil actions,
by settlement, verdict, judgment, or otherwise, and whose
interest is based, in whole or in part, on a funding-based
obligation to the action or group of actions or the
appearing counsel or any contractual co-counsel or the law
firms of the counsel or co-counsel executed with:
(i) Any attorney representing a party;
(ii) Any co-counsel in the litigation with a
contingent fee interest in the representation of that party;
or
(iii) Any third-party who has a collateral-based
interest in the contingency fees of the counsel or co-
counsel firm related in whole or part to the fees derived
from representing that party.
436.580. 1. A foreign principal or agent of a foreign
principal shall not engage in litigation funding in this
state.
2. A foreign principal or agent of a foreign principal
shall not, directly or indirectly, invest in, finance, fund,
or loan money to a litigation funder in this state.
3. A person engaged in litigation funding in this
state may not, directly or indirectly:
(1) Become affiliated with or maintain an affiliation
with a principal or agent of a foreign principal; or

SB 881 4
(2) Allow a foreign principal or agent of a foreign
principal to invest in, maintain an ownership interest in,
or exercise any control over a litigation funding agreement
or litigation funded through a litigation funding agreement.
436.585. 1. A litigation funder shall have a
fiduciary duty to a party in a civil action if it has
provided litigation funding for that civil action.
2. No litigation funder shall engage in any act,
practice, or course of business that is inconsistent with
the litigation funder's fiduciary duty pursuant to
subsection 1 of this section.
3. A litigation funder shall be jointly liable for any
award or order imposing or assessing costs or monetary
sanctions against a funded party or funded party's attorney
arising from or relating to the funded civil action.
436.590. 1. It shall be an unlawful practice pursuant
to section 407.020 to violate any provision of section
436.575 to 436.590, and pursuant to sections 407.010 to
407.130, the violation shall be subject to penalties,
remedies, and procedures provided in sections 407.010 to
407.130. The remedies available in this section are
cumulative and in addition to any other remedies available
by law.
2. Any person who willfully and knowingly engages in
any act or practice declared to be unlawful by any provision
of section 436.580 shall be guilty of a class E felony.
3. The attorney general may institute a legal action
to prohibit a person who violates any provision of section
436.580 or 436.585 from providing litigation funding in this
state.

SB 881 5
4. A litigation funding agreement that is entered into
in violation of section 436.580 is void and unenforceable.
✓